AnimThNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimThStem;


LEXICON AnimThStem

ඇත AnimThNoun;
සත AnimThNoun;
පුත AnimThNoun;
වියත AnimThNoun;


LEXICON AnimThNoun

්+N+Nom+Sg:ා #;
්+N+Nom+Sg:ු #;
්+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:්තු #;
්+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:්හු #;
්+N+Nom+Pl+Inanim:ුන් #;
්+N+Nom+Pl+Inanim:්තුන් #;
්+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
්+N+Dat+Sg:ාට #;
්+N+Dat+Sg:ුට #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:ුන්ට #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:්තුන්ට #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙන් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:්තුන්ගෙන් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:ුන්ගෙන් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගෙ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ුගෙ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ුගේ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:ුන්ගෙ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:්තුන්ගෙ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:ුන්ගේ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:්තුන්ගේ #;
